Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.480

Remedies—Affecting corporate franchise.

Upon petition by the attorney general, the court may, in its discretion, order the dissolution, or suspension or forfeiture of franchise, of any corporation for repeated or flagrant violation of this chapter or the terms of any order of injunction hereunder.

[ 1965 c 153 s 18. Formerly RCW 18.44.170.]